Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-125
Banks; board of directors; meetings; record; contents; publication.

A full and complete record of the proceedings and business of all meetings of the board of directors shall be spread upon the bank's minutes. Such record of the meetings shall show the gross earnings and disposition thereof by indicating expenses and taxes paid, worthless items charged off, depreciation in assets, amount carried to surplus fund, and amount of dividend, and shall also indicate the amount of undivided profits remaining. Published statements of assets and liabilities shall show for undivided profits only the net amount after deducting all expenses.

Laws 1923, c. 191, § 37, p. 458;

C.S.1929, § 8-139;

R.S.1943, § 8-141;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 25, p. 144.